Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.037

Comprehensive state mine rescue plan—Submittal to legislature.

The department shall consult with appropriate local, state, federal, and private sector officials in developing a comprehensive state mine rescue plan. The plan shall identify mine rescue resources, set forth a framework for a coordinated response to mine rescue emergencies, identify shortfalls, and recommend solutions.

The draft of the comprehensive state mine rescue plan and a schedule for submittal of the final plan shall be submitted to the legislature on January 13, 1986.

[ 1986 c 266 s 26; 1985 c 459 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—1985 c 459: See note following RCW 79.14.510.